Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Services for Elderly Persons

205.455.
Definitions for KRS 205.460.

As used in KRS 205.460:

“Chore services” means the performance of heavy housecleaning, minor household repairs, yard tasks, and other activities needed to assist in the maintenance of a functionally impaired elderly person in his own home.

“Core services” means those services, including but not limited to client assessment and case management services, designed to identify a functionally impaired elderly person’s needs, develop a plan of care, arrange for services, monitor the provision of services, and reassess the person’s needs on a regular basis.

“Cabinet” means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

“District” means an area development district designated pursuant to KRS 147A.050.

“Escort services” means the accompaniment of a person who requires such assistance for reasons of safety or protection to or from his physician, dentist, or other necessary services.

“Essential services” means those services which are most needed to prevent unnecessary institutionalization of functionally impaired elderly persons. Essential services shall include chore services, home-delivered meals, home-health aide services, homemaker services, respite services, escort services, and home repair services.

“Functionally impaired elderly person” means any person, sixty (60) years of age or older, with physical or mental limitations which restrict individual ability to perform the normal activities of daily living and which impede individual capacity to live independently, thus rendering such person at risk of entering an institution. Functional impairment shall be determined through a functional assessment developed by the cabinet and delivered to each applicant for essential services.

“Home-delivered meals” means the provision of a nutritionally sound meal, that meets at least one-third (1/3) of the current daily recommended dietary allowance, to a functionally impaired elderly person who is homebound by reason of illness, incapacity, or disability.

“Home-health aide services” means the performance of simple procedures, including but not limited to personal care, ambulation, exercises, household services essential to health care at home, assistance with medications that are ordinarily self-administered, reporting changes in the patient’s condition and needs, and completing appropriate records.

“Homemaker services” means general household activities, including but not limited to nonmedical personal care, shopping, meal preparation, and routine household care, provided by a trained homemaker when the person regularly responsible for these activities is temporarily absent or unable to manage the home and care for himself or others in the home.

“Home repair services” means the provision of minor home adaptations, additions, or modifications to enable the elderly to live independently or safely or to facilitate mobility including, where appropriate, emergency summons systems.

“Respite services” means care provided by an approved caregiver or agency for a designated time period because of absence or need for relief of a primary caregiver.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 169, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 280, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 426, § 193, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 6, § 24, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 226, effective June 20, 2005; 2017 ch. 80, § 32, effective June 29, 2017.

205.460.
Essential services — Funding — Collection of fees and contributions.

The cabinet shall fund, directly or through a contracting entity or entities, in each district, a program of essential services which shall have as its primary purpose the prevention of unnecessary institutionalization of functionally impaired elderly persons. The cabinet may use funds appropriated under this section to contract with public and private agencies, long-term care facilities, local governments, and other providers to provide core and essential services. The cabinet may provide core and essential services when such services cannot otherwise be purchased.

In providing essential services, all existing community resources available to functionally impaired elderly persons shall be utilized. Additional services may be provided, but shall not be funded from funds appropriated under this section. Volunteers may be used where practicable to provide essential services to functionally impaired elderly persons. The cabinet or contracting entity shall provide or arrange for the provision of training and supervision of volunteers to ensure the delivery of quality services. The cabinet or contracting entity shall provide or arrange for appropriate insurance coverage to protect volunteers from personal liability while acting within the scope of their volunteer duties. In providing essential services under this section, the cabinet shall provide services to meet the needs of the minority elderly as identified by the cabinet pursuant to KRS 205.201.

Entities contracting with the cabinet to provide essential services under KRS 205.455 and this section shall provide a minimum of fifteen percent (15%) of the funding necessary for the support of program operations. No local match is required for assessment and case management. Local contributions, whether materials, commodities, transportation, office space, personal services, or other types of facilities services, or funds may be evaluated and counted toward the fifteen percent (15%) local funding requirements.

When possible, funding for core services may be obtained under:

The Comprehensive Annual Social Services Program plan under Title XX of the Social Security Act;

The Medical Assistance Plan under Titles XVIII and XIX of the Social Security Act;

The State Plan on Aging under the Older Americans Act; or

Veteran’s benefit programs under the provisions of 38 U.S.C. secs. 1 et seq., as amended.

Providers contracting with the cabinet to provide essential services shall be responsible for the collection of fees and contributions for services in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet. Providers are authorized to assess and collect fees for services rendered in accordance with those administrative regulations. To help pay for essential services received, a functionally impaired elderly person shall pay an amount of money based on an overall ability to pay in accordance with a schedule of fees established by the cabinet. Fees shall reflect the degree to which the cabinet or contracting entity uses volunteers in the provision of services. Where essential services are provided by volunteers, fees shall only be assessed in an amount that will cover the cost of materials and other goods used in the provision of services. The cost of materials and other goods used by volunteers shall be reasonably similar to the cost of goods when paid personnel are used. Fees shall not be required of any person who is “needy aged” as defined in KRS 205.010; however, voluntary contributions may be encouraged. This subsection shall not apply to programs utilizing federal funds when administrative regulations require contributions to revert to the original funding source.

The cabinet may seek federal waivers if necessary to enable the use of funds provided through Titles XVIII and XIX of the Social Security Act for the provision of essential services.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 169, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 280, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 246, § 5, effective July 14, 1992.

205.465.
Report by cabinet. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 169, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

205.470.
Centralized resource and referral center for aging caregivers of individuals with an intellectual disability or other developmental disability.

As used in this section, “aging caregiver” means an individual age sixty (60) or older who provides care for an individual with an intellectual disability or other developmental disability.

If state, federal, or other funds are available, the Kentucky Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities shall, in cooperation with the Department for Aging and Independent Living and the Department for Medicaid Services, establish a centralized resource and referral center designed as a one-stop, seamless system to provide aging caregivers with information and assistance with choices and planning for long-term supports for individuals with an intellectual disability or developmental disability.

The center created in subsection (2) of this section shall provide but not be limited to the following services:

Comprehensive information on available programs and services, including but not limited to:

Residential services;

Employment training;

Supported employment;

Behavioral support;

Respite services;

Adult day health or adult day social services;

Support coordination;

Home or environmental modifications;

Community living services, including an attendant, and assistance with homemaking, shopping, and personal care;

Support groups in the community;

Psychiatric services;

Consumer-directed options;

Attorneys or legal services to assist with will preparation; and

The impact of inheritance on government benefits and options, including establishing a special needs trust;

Printed material and Internet-based information related to:

Options for future planning;

Financial and estate planning;

Wills and trusts; and

Advance directives and funeral and burial arrangements; and

Referral to community resources.

The center created in subsection (2) of this section shall operate a toll-free number at least during regular business hours and shall publish information required in paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of this section and a description of services provided by the center on a cabinet Web site.

The center created in subsection (2) of this section shall make the information listed in subsection (3) of this section available to the support broker and any representative of an individual who is participating in a Medicaid consumer-directed option.

The center shall use electronic information technology to track services provided and to follow-up with individuals served and provide additional information or referrals as needed.

The department may contract with a private entity to provide the services required under subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

The cabinet may provide services identified in subsection (3) of this section to individuals of any age who are caregivers of individuals with an intellectual disability or developmental disability.

Prior to January 1, 2008, the department shall submit a report to the Interim Joint Committee on Health and Welfare that includes but is not limited to the following information:

The number of individuals who contacted the center;

A description of the categories of questions asked by individuals calling the center; and

A summary of the services provided, including the community resources to which individuals were referred.

History.
Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 195, § 6, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 24, § 15, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 141, § 11, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 146, § 62, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 158, § 26, effective July 12, 2012.